src/fst/morphology/affixes/numbers.lexc
!! # East Mari Numeral inflection

LEXICON QNT_  !!= * @CODE@
+Qnt: # ;

LEXICON KvMurt !!= * @CODE@
: N-ava_01 ;

LEXICON KvK !!= * @CODE@ cardinal numerals
: N-ava_01 ;

LEXICON KvK_ATTR !!= * @CODE@ cardinal numerals in noun phrase scope
+Attr: # ;


LEXICON KvKoll !!= * @CODE@
: # ;


LEXICON NUM-COLL_ !!= * @CODE@
кокыт+Num+Coll+Acc+PxPl1+So/PC:когыньнам K ;
кокыт+Num+Coll+Acc+PxPl2+So/PC:когыньдам K ;
кокыт+Num+Coll+Acc+PxPl3+So/PC:когыньыштым K ;
кокыт+Num+Coll+Dat+PxPl1+So/CP:когылянна K ;
кокыт+Num+Coll+Dat+PxPl2+So/CP:когылянда K ;
кокыт+Num+Coll+Dat+PxPl3+So/CP:когылянышт K ;
кокыт+Num+Coll+Gen+PxPl1+So/PC:когыньнан K ;
кокыт+Num+Coll+Gen+PxPl2+So/PC:когыньдан K ;
кокыт+Num+Coll+Gen+PxPl3+So/PC:когыньыштын K ;
кокыт+Num+Coll+Nom+PxPl1:когыньна K ;
кокыт+Num+Coll+Nom+PxPl2:когыньда K ;
кокыт+Num+Coll+Nom+PxPl3:когыньышт K ;

кумыт+Num+Coll+Acc+PxPl1+So/PC:кумыньнам K ;
кумыт+Num+Coll+Acc+PxPl2+So/PC:кумыньдам K ;
кумыт+Num+Coll+Acc+PxPl3+So/PC:кумыньыштым K ;
кумыт+Num+Coll+Dat+PxPl1+So/CP:кумылянна K ;
кумыт+Num+Coll+Dat+PxPl2+So/CP:кумылянда K ;
кумыт+Num+Coll+Dat+PxPl3+So/CP:кумылянышт K ;
кумыт+Num+Coll+Gen+PxPl1+So/PC:кумыньнан K ;
кумыт+Num+Coll+Gen+PxPl2+So/PC:кумыньдан K ;
кумыт+Num+Coll+Gen+PxPl3+So/PC:кумыньыштын K ;
кумыт+Num+Coll+Nom+PxPl1:кумыньна K ;
кумыт+Num+Coll+Nom+PxPl2:кумыньда K ;
кумыт+Num+Coll+Nom+PxPl3:кумыньышт K ;

нылыт+Num+Coll+Acc+PxPl1+So/PC:нылыньнам K ;
нылыт+Num+Coll+Acc+PxPl2+So/PC:нылыньдам K ;
нылыт+Num+Coll+Acc+PxPl3+So/PC:нылыньыштым K ;
нылыт+Num+Coll+Dat+PxPl1+So/PC:нылыньналан K ;
нылыт+Num+Coll+Dat+PxPl2+So/PC:нылыньдалан K ;
нылыт+Num+Coll+Dat+PxPl3+So/PC:нылыньыштлан K ;
нылыт+Num+Coll+Gen+PxPl1+So/PC:нылыньнан K ;
нылыт+Num+Coll+Gen+PxPl2+So/PC:нылыньдан K ;
нылыт+Num+Coll+Gen+PxPl3+So/PC:нылыньыштын K ;
нылыт+Num+Coll+Nom+PxPl1:нылыньна K ;
нылыт+Num+Coll+Nom+PxPl2:нылыньда K ;
нылыт+Num+Coll+Nom+PxPl3:нылыньышт K ;

визыт+Num+Coll+Acc+PxPl1+So/PC:визыньнам K ;
визыт+Num+Coll+Acc+PxPl2+So/PC:визыньдам K ;
визыт+Num+Coll+Acc+PxPl3+So/PC:визыньыштым K ;
визыт+Num+Coll+Dat+PxPl1+So/PC:визыньналан K ;
визыт+Num+Coll+Dat+PxPl2+So/PC:визыньдалан K ;
визыт+Num+Coll+Dat+PxPl3+So/PC:визыньыштлан K ;
визыт+Num+Coll+Gen+PxPl1+So/PC:визыньнан K ;
визыт+Num+Coll+Gen+PxPl2+So/PC:визыньдан K ;
визыт+Num+Coll+Gen+PxPl3+So/PC:визыньыштын K ;
визыт+Num+Coll+Nom+PxPl1:визыньна K ;
визыт+Num+Coll+Nom+PxPl2:визыньда K ;
визыт+Num+Coll+Nom+PxPl3:визыньышт K ;

LEXICON KvInd !!= * @CODE@
+Num: # ;

LEXICON KvO
+A+Ord+Attr: ENDLEX ;
+A+Ord: N-ava_01 ; 



LEXICON Kv-a/e  !!= * @CODE@
+Num: # ;
